Utah statutes.
31A-11-103.   Rates.

(1)  Rates charged to holders of motor club service contracts may not be inadequate, excessive, or unfairly discriminatory.

(2)  If, after a hearing, the commissioner finds a motor club's rates in violation of this section, the commissioner may issue an order to the club to make a filing under Section 31A-19a-203. After issuance of such an order, the commissioner and the club shall proceed under Chapter 19a until the commissioner determines that the club's rates conform to the requirements of this section.  Chapter 19a is then inapplicable to the club until the issuance of another order under this section.



Amended by Chapter 130, 1999 General Session

